Washington statutes.
RCW 43.83.360

State social and health services construction account—Definition.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1468-S.SL) ***

(1) The state social and health services construction account is hereby created in the state treasury and shall be used exclusively for the purpose of providing needed capital improvements consisting of the planning, acquisition, construction, remodeling, improving, and equipping of social and health services facilities.

(2) As used in this section, the term "social and health services facilities" shall include, without limitation, facilities for use in veterans' service programs, adult correction programs, juvenile rehabilitation programs, mental health programs, and developmental disabilities programs for which an appropriation is made from the social and health services construction account in the general fund by chapter 276, Laws of 1975 1st ex. sess., the capital appropriations act, or subsequent capital appropriations acts.

[ 2015 1st sp.s. c 4 s 36; 1991 sp.s. c 13 s 56; 1985 c 57 s 49; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 125 s 3. Formerly RCW 43.83H.030.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—Severability—1991 sp.s. c 13: See notes following RCW 18.08.240.

Effective date—1985 c 57: See note following RCW 18.04.105.